Utah statutes.
17B-2a-804.   Additional public transit district powers.
(1)  In addition to the powers conferred on a public transit district under
Section 17B-1-103, a public transit district may:
(a)  provide a public transit system for the transportation of passengers and
their incidental baggage;
(b)  notwithstanding Subsection 17B-1-103(2)(g) and subject to Section 17B-
2a-817, levy and collect property taxes only for the purpose of paying:
(i)  principal and interest of bonded indebtedness of the public transit
district; or
(ii)  a final judgment against the public transit district if:
(A)  the amount of the judgment exceeds the amount of any collectable
insurance or indemnity policy; and
(B)  the district is required by a final court order to levy a tax to pay the
judgment;
(c)  insure against:
(i)  loss of revenues from damage to or destruction of some or all of a public
transit system from any cause;
(ii)  public liability;
(iii)  property damage; or
(iv)  any other type of event, act, or omission;
(d)  acquire, contract for, lease, construct, own, operate, control, or use:
(i)  a right-of-way, rail line, monorail, bus line, station, platform,
switchyard, terminal, parking lot, or any other facility necessary or
convenient for public transit service; or
(ii)  any structure necessary for access by persons and vehicles;
(e) (i)  hire, lease, or contract for the supplying or management of a
facility, operation, equipment, service, employee, or management staff of an
operator; and
(ii)  provide for a sublease or subcontract by the operator upon terms that
are in the public interest;
(f)  operate feeder bus lines and other feeder services as necessary;
(g)  accept a grant, contribution, or loan, directly through the sale of
securities or equipment trust certificates or otherwise, from the United
States, or from a department, instrumentality, or agency of the United States,
to:
(i)  establish, finance, construct, improve, maintain, or operate transit
facilities and equipment; or
(ii)  study and plan transit facilities in accordance with any legislation
passed by Congress;
(h)  cooperate with and enter into an agreement with the state or an agency of
the state to establish transit facilities and equipment or to study or plan
transit facilities;
(i)  issue bonds as provided in and subject to Chapter 1, Part 11, Local
District Bonds, to carry out the purposes of the district;
(j)  from bond proceeds or any other available funds, reimburse the state or
an agency of the state for an advance or contribution from the state or state
agency; and
(k)  do anything necessary to avail itself of any aid, assistance, or
cooperation available under federal law, including complying with labor
standards and making arrangements for employees required by the United States
or a department, instrumentality, or agency of the United States.
(2)  A public transit district may be funded from any combination of federal,
state, or local funds.
(3)  A public transit district may not acquire property by eminent domain.
